California, session 20252026, SB447.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4856 of the Labor Code is amended to read:4856. (a) Whenever any local employee who is a firefighter, peace officer as described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or a Sheriff’s Special Officer of the County of Orange, is killed in the performance of their duty or dies as a result of an accident or injury caused by external violence or physical force incurred in the performance of their duty, the employer shall continue providing health benefits to the deceased employee’s spouse under the same terms and conditions provided prior to the death, or prior to the accident or injury that caused the death, of the employee unless the surviving spouse elects to receive a lump-sum survivors benefit in lieu of monthly benefits. Minor dependents shall continue to receive benefits under the coverage provided the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, until 26 years of age. However, pursuant to Section 22822 of the Government Code, the surviving spouse may not add the new spouse or stepchildren as family members under the continued health benefits coverage of the surviving spouse.(b) Subdivision (a) also applies to the employer of any local employee who is a firefighter, or peace officer as described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who was killed in the performance of their duty or who died as a result of an accident or injury caused by external violence or physical force incurred in the performance of their duty prior to September 30, 1996.